Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2893.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-58 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-58. Statewide mandatory rental registry.
(a) All landlords who lease a residential property constructed prior to 1978 shall register
the following information with the department of health for the sole purposes of enforcement of
lead hazard mitigation laws and promotion of lead safety by the department of health:
(1) Names of individual landlords or any business entity responsible for leasing to a tenant
under this chapter;
(2) An active business address, PO box, or home address;
(3) An active email address;
(4) An active telephone number that would reasonably facilitate communications with the
tenant of each dwelling unit;
(5) Any property manager, management company, or agent for service of the property,
along with the business address, or PO box, or home address of the property manager, management
company, or agent and including:
(i) An active email address; and
(ii) An active telephone number, for each such person or legal entity, if applicable, for each
dwelling unit; and
(6) Information necessary to identify each dwelling unit.

(b) All landlords who lease a residential property constructed prior to 1978 and that is not
exempt from the requirements of chapter 128.1 of title 42 (“lead hazard mitigation”) shall, in
addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section, for each dwelling unit, provide the
department of health with a valid certificate of conformance in accordance with chapter 128.1 of
title 42 (“lead hazard mitigation”) and regulations derived therefrom, or evidence sufficient to
demonstrate that they are exempt from the requirement to obtain a certificate of conformance.
(c) Contingent upon available funding, the department of health, or designee, shall create
a publicly accessible online database containing the information obtained in accordance with
subsections (a)(1), (a)(5)(i), and (a)(5)(ii) and (b) of this section, but excluding subsections (a)(2),
(a)(3), (a)(4), (a)(5), and (b) of this section, no later than nine (9) months following the effective
date of this section [June 20, 2023]. The department of health shall not share the data with any other
governmental agency.
(d) All landlords subject to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section as of
September 1, 2024, shall register the information required by those subsections no later than
October 1, 2024.
A landlord who acquires a residential rental property constructed before 1978, or begins
leasing a rental property that was constructed before 1978 to a new tenant, after September 1, 2024,
shall register the information required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section within thirty (30)
days after the acquisition or lease to a tenant, whichever date is earlier. All landlords subject to the
requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall, following initial registration, re-register
by October 1 of each year in order to update any information required to comply with subsections
(a) and (b) of this section, or to confirm that the information already supplied remains accurate.
(e) Any person or entity subject to subsections (a) and (b) of this section who fails to
comply with the registration provision in subsection (d) of this section, shall be subject to a civil
fine of at least fifty dollars ($50.00) per month for failure to register the information required by
subsection (a) of this section, or at least one hundred and twenty-five dollars ($125) per month, for
failure to register the information required by subsection (b) of this section.
(f) All civil penalties imposed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall be payable to
the department of health. There is to be established a restricted receipt account to be known as the
“rental registry account” which shall be a separate account within the department of health.
Penalties received by the department pursuant to the terms of this section shall be deposited into
the account. Monies deposited into the account shall be transferred to the department of health and
shall be expended for the purpose of administering the provisions of this section or lead hazard
mitigation, abatement, enforcement, or poisoning prevention. No penalties shall be levied under
LC005269 - Page 2 of 4

this section prior to October 1, 2024.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of § 34-18-35, a landlord or any agent of a landlord
may not commence an action to evict for nonpayment of rent in any court of competent jurisdiction,
unless, at the time the action is commenced, the landlord is in compliance with the requirements of
subsections (a), (b), and (d) of this section. A landlord must present the court with evidence of
compliance with subsections (a), (b), and (d) of this section at the time of filing an action to evict
for nonpayment of rent in order to proceed with the civil action.
(h) The department of health may commence an action for injunctive relief and additional
civil penalties of up to fifty dollars ($50.00) per violation against any landlord who repeatedly fails
to comply with subsection (a) of this section. The attorney general may commence an action for
injunctive relief and additional civil penalties of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation
against any landlord who repeatedly fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section. Any
penalties obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be used for the purposes of lead hazard
mitigation, abatement, enforcement, or poisoning prevention, or for the purpose of administering
the provisions of this section. No penalties shall be levied under this section prior to October 1,
2024.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005269
========
LC005269 - Page 3 of 4